Hawaii statutes.
[§468L-12] Criminal penalties. A
person commits the criminal offense of theft if the person, being a travel
agency or an agent, employee, or independent contractor of a travel agency,
knowingly or intentionally violates section 468L-5(a), (b), or (c). [L 1991, c
285, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next